District of Columbia statutes.
24-251.08

Severability.

If any section or provision of this subchapter is held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid in its application to any person or circumstance, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the applicability of that section or provision, or the applicability of the remaining sections or provisions of this subchapter, to other persons or circumstances.

History

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-130, § 9, 23 DCR 9694

Cross References

Non-health related occupations and professions, regulation by Mayor, excepted occupations, see § 47-2853.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-488.
1973 Ed., § 24-488.